Florida, session 2026, SB122.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âChapter 205, Florida Statutes, consisting of ss. 23 205.013, 205.022, 205.023, 205.0315, 205.032, 205.033, 205.042, 24 205.043, 205.044, 205.045, 205.053, 205.0532, 205.0535, 25 205.0536, 205.0537, 205.054, 205.055, 205.063, 205.064, 205.065, 26 205.066, 205.067, 205.162, 205.191, 205.192, 205.193, 205.194, 27 205.196, 205.1965, 205.1967, 205.1969, 205.1971, 205.1973, and 28 205.1975, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 29 Section 2.âSection 218.150, Florida Statutes, is created to 30 read: 31 218.150âMunicipal business tax measured by gross receipts 32 may continue.âNotwithstanding the repeal of chapter 205, F.S., 33 by this act, a municipality that imposes a business tax on 34 merchants which is measured by gross receipts from the sale of 35 merchandise or services, or both, may continue to impose such 36 tax and may, by ordinance, revise the definition of the term 37 âmerchant.â However, the municipality may not revise the rate of 38 the tax measured by gross sales. 39 Section 3.âThe Division of Law Revision is directed to 40 replace the phrase âthis actâ wherever it occurs in s. 218.150, 41 Florida Statutes, with the assigned chapter number of this act. 42 Section 4.âSubsection (2), paragraph (b) of subsection (3), 43 and paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 125.01047, 44 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 45 125.01047âRules and ordinances relating to towing 46 services.â 47 (2)âThe prohibition set forth in subsection (1) does not 48 affect a countyâs authority to: 49 (a)âLevy a reasonable business tax under s. 205.0315, s. 50 205.033, or s. 205.0535. 51 (b)âimpose and collect a reasonable administrative fee or 52 charge on the registered owner or other legally authorized 53 person in control of a vehicle or vessel, not to exceed 25 54 percent of the maximum towing rate, to cover the cost of 55 enforcement, including parking enforcement, by the county when 56 the vehicle or vessel is towed from public property. An 57 authorized wrecker operator or towing business may impose and 58 collect the administrative fee or charge on behalf of the county 59 and shall remit such fee or charge to the county only after it 60 is collected. 61 (3) 62 (b)âA charter county may impose and collect an 63 administrative fee or charge as provided in subsection (2) 64 paragraph (2)(b) but may not impose such fee or charge on a 65 towing business or an authorized wrecker operator. If the 66 charter county imposes such administrative fee or charge, the 67 charter county may authorize a towing business or authorized 68 wrecker operator to impose and collect such fee or charge on 69 behalf of the county, and the towing business or authorized 70 wrecker operator shall remit such fee or charge to the charter 71 county only after it is collected. 72 (4) 73 (b)âA charter county may impose and collect an 74 administrative fee or charge as provided in subsection (2) 75 paragraph (2)(b); however, it may not impose that fee or charge 76 upon a towing business or an authorized wrecker operator. If 77 such charter county imposes such administrative fee or charge, 78 such fee or charge must be imposed on the registered owner or 79 other legally authorized person in control of a vehicle or 80 vessel. The fee or charge may not exceed 25 percent of the 81 maximum towing rate to cover the cost of enforcement, including 82 parking enforcement, by the charter county when the vehicle or 83 vessel is towed from public property. The charter county may 84 authorize an authorized wrecker operator or towing business to 85 impose and collect the administrative fee or charge on behalf of 86 the charter county, and the authorized wrecker operator or 87 towing business shall remit such fee or charge to the charter 88 county only after it is collected. 89 Section 5.âSubsection (2) of section 166.04465, Florida 90 Statutes, is amended to read: 91 166.04465âRules and ordinances relating to towing 92 services.â 93 (2)âThe prohibition set forth in subsection (1) does not 94 affect a municipalityâs authority to: 95 (a)âLevy a reasonable business tax under s. 205.0315, s. 96 205.043, or s. 205.0535. 97 (b)âimpose and collect a reasonable administrative fee or 98 charge on the registered owner or other legally authorized 99 person in control of a vehicle or vessel, not to exceed 25 100 percent of the maximum towing rate, to cover the cost of 101 enforcement, including parking enforcement, by the municipality 102 when the vehicle or vessel is towed from public property. An 103 authorized wrecker operator or towing business may impose and 104 collect the administrative fee or charge on behalf of the 105 municipality and shall remit such fee or charge to the 106 municipality only after it is collected. 107 Section 6.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 108 202.24, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 109 202.24âLimitations on local taxes and fees imposed on 110 dealers of communications services.â 111 (2) 112 (c)âThis subsection does not apply to: 113 1.âLocal communications services taxes levied under this 114 chapter. 115 2.âAd valorem taxes levied pursuant to chapter 200. 116 3.âBusiness taxes levied under chapter 205. 117 3.4.ââ911â service charges levied under chapter 365. 118 4.5.âAmounts charged for the rental or other use of 119 property owned by a public body which is not in the public 120 rights-of-way to a dealer of communications services for any 121 purpose, including, but not limited to, the placement or 122 attachment of equipment used in the provision of communications 123 services. 124 5.6.âPermit fees of general applicability which are not 125 related to placing or maintaining facilities in or on public 126 roads or rights-of-way. 127 6.7.âPermit fees related to placing or maintaining 128 facilities in or on public roads or rights-of-way pursuant to s. 129 337.401. 130 7.8.âAny in-kind requirements, institutional networks, or 131 contributions for, or in support of, the use or construction of 132 public, educational, or governmental access facilities allowed 133 under federal law and imposed on providers of video service 134 pursuant to any existing ordinance or an existing franchise 135 agreement granted by each municipality or county, under which 136 ordinance or franchise agreement service is provided before July 137 1, 2007, or as permitted under chapter 610. This subparagraph 138 does not prohibit providers of video service from recovering the 139 expenses as allowed under federal law. 140 8.9.âSpecial assessments and impact fees. 141 9.10.âPole attachment fees that are charged by a local 142 government for attachments to utility poles owned by the local 143 government. 144 10.11.âUtility service fees or other similar user fees for 145 utility services. 146 11.12.âAny other generally applicable tax, fee, charge, or 147 imposition authorized by general law on July 1, 2000, which is 148 not specifically prohibited by this subsection or included as a 149 replaced revenue source in s. 202.20. 150 Section 7.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 151 213.0535, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 152 213.0535âRegistration Information Sharing and Exchange 153 Program.â 154 (4)âThere are two levels of participation: 155 (a)âEach unit of state or local government responsible for 156 administering one or more of the provisions specified in 157 subparagraphs 1.-7. 1.-8. is a level-one participant. Level-one 158 participants shall exchange, monthly or quarterly, as determined 159 jointly by each participant and the department, the data 160 enumerated in subsection (2) for each new registrant, new filer, 161 or initial reporter, permittee, or licensee, with respect to the 162 following taxes, licenses, or permits: 163 1.âThe sales and use tax imposed under chapter 212. 164 2.âThe tourist development tax imposed under s. 125.0104. 165 3.âThe tourist impact tax imposed under s. 125.0108. 166 4.âLocal business taxes imposed under chapter 205. 167 4.5.âConvention development taxes imposed under s. 168 212.0305. 169 5.6.âPublic lodging and food service establishment licenses 170 issued pursuant to chapter 509. 171 6.7.âBeverage law licenses issued pursuant to chapter 561. 172 7.8.âA municipal resort tax as authorized under chapter 67 173 930, Laws of Florida. 174 Section 8.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 175 213.055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 176 213.055âDeclared emergency; waiver or suspension of 177 specified revenue laws and other requirements.â 178 (3) 179 (b)1.âNotwithstanding any other law, an out-of-state 180 business that is conducting operations within this state during 181 a disaster-response period solely for purposes of performing 182 emergency-related work or pursuant to a mutual aid agreement is 183 not considered to have established a level of presence that 184 would require that business to register, file, and remit state 185 or local taxes or fees or require that business to be subject to 186 any registration, licensing, or filing requirements in this 187 state. For purposes of any state or local tax on or measured, in 188 whole or in part, by net or gross income or receipts, the 189 activity of the out-of-state business conducted in this state 190 during the disaster-response period must be disregarded with 191 respect to any filing requirements for such tax, including the 192 filing required for a consolidated group of which the out-of- 193 state business may be a part. This includes the following: 194 a.âReemployment assistance taxes. 195 b.âState or local professional or occupational licensing 196 requirements or related fees. 197 c.âLocal business taxes. 198 c.d.âTaxes on the operation of commercial motor vehicles. 199 d.e.âCorporate income tax. 200 e.f.âTangible personal property tax and use tax on 201 equipment that is brought into the state by the out-of-state 202 business, used by the out-of-state business only to perform 203 emergency-related work during the disaster-response period, and 204 removed from the state by the out-of-state business after the 205 disaster-response period. 206 2.âNotwithstanding any other law, an out-of-state employee 207 whose only employment in this state is for the performance of 208 emergency-related work or pursuant to a mutual aid agreement 209 during a disaster-response period is not required to comply with 210 state or local occupational licensing requirements or related 211 fees. 212 Section 9.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 213 213.756, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 214 213.756âFunds collected are state tax funds.â 215 (2) 216 (b)âThis subsection applies to those taxes enumerated in s. 217 72.011, excluding chapter 202 and that portion of chapter 203 218 collected thereunder, and also applies to taxes imposed under 219 chapter 205. 220 Section 10.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 221 330.41, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 222 330.41âUnmanned Aircraft Systems Act.â 223 (3)âREGULATION.â 224 (c)âExcept as otherwise expressly provided, a political 225 subdivision may not withhold issuance of a business tax receipt, 226 development permit, or other use approval to a drone delivery 227 service or enact or enforce an ordinance or resolution that 228 prohibits a drone delivery serviceâs operation based on the 229 location of its drone port, notwithstanding part II of chapter 230 163 and chapter 205. A political subdivision may enforce minimum 231 setback and landscaping regulations that are generally 232 applicable to permitted uses in the drone port siteâs zoning 233 district. This paragraph may not be construed to authorize a 234 political subdivision to require additional landscaping as a 235 condition of approval of a drone port. 236 Section 11.âParagraph (f) of subsection (3) of section 237 337.401, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 238 337.401âUse of right-of-way for utilities subject to 239 regulation; permit; fees.â 240 (3) 241 (f)âExcept as expressly allowed or authorized by general 242 law and except for the rights-of-way permit fees subject to 243 paragraph (c), a municipality or county may not levy on a 244 provider of communications services a tax, fee, or other charge 245 or imposition for operating as a provider of communications 246 services within the jurisdiction of the municipality or county 247 which is in any way related to using its roads or rights-of-way. 248 A municipality or county may not require or solicit in-kind 249 compensation, except as otherwise provided in s. 202.24(2)(c)7. 250 s. 202.24(2)(c)8., provided that the in-kind compensation is not 251 a franchise fee under federal law. Nothing in this paragraph 252 impairs the authority of a municipality or county to request 253 public, educational, or governmental access channels pursuant to 254 s. 610.109. Nothing in this paragraph shall impair any ordinance 255 or agreement in effect on May 22, 1998, or any voluntary 256 agreement entered into subsequent to that date, which provides 257 for or allows in-kind compensation by a telecommunications 258 company. 259 Section 12.âParagraph (d) of subsection (1) of section 260 376.84, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 261 376.84âBrownfield redevelopment economic incentives.âIt is 262 the intent of the Legislature that brownfield redevelopment 263 activities be viewed as opportunities to significantly improve 264 the utilization, general condition, and appearance of these 265 sites. Different standards than those in place for new 266 development, as allowed under current state and local laws, 267 should be used to the fullest extent to encourage the 268 redevelopment of a brownfield. State and local governments are 269 encouraged to offer redevelopment incentives for this purpose, 270 as an ongoing public investment in infrastructure and services, 271 to help eliminate the public health and environmental hazards, 272 and to promote the creation of jobs in these areas. Such 273 incentives may include financial, regulatory, and technical 274 assistance to persons and businesses involved in the 275 redevelopment of the brownfield pursuant to this act. 276 (1)âFinancial incentives and local incentives for 277 redevelopment may include, but not be limited to: 278 (d)âWaiver, reduction, or limitation by line of business 279 with respect to business taxes pursuant to chapter 205. 280 Section 13.âSubsection (4) of section 379.3761, Florida 281 Statutes, is amended to read: 282 379.3761âExhibition or sale of wildlife; fees; 283 classifications.â 284 (4)âThe provisions of this section relative to licensing 285 for exhibition do not apply to any municipal, county, state, or 286 other publicly owned wildlife exhibit or any traveling zoo, 287 circus, or exhibit licensed under chapter 205. 288 Section 14.âSubsection (5) of section 482.071, Florida 289 Statutes, is amended to read: 290 482.071âLicenses.â 291 (5)âA license under this section is a prerequisite for the 292 issuance of a local occupational license to engage in pest 293 control, as provided in s. 205.1967. 294 Section 15.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 295 482.242, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 296 482.242âPreemption.â 297 (1)âThis chapter is intended as comprehensive and exclusive 298 regulation of pest control in this state. The provisions of this 299 chapter preempt to the state all regulation of the activities 300 and operations of pest control services, including the 301 pesticides used pursuant to labeling and registration approved 302 under part I of chapter 487. No local government or political 303 subdivision of the state may enact or enforce an ordinance that 304 regulates pest control, except that the preemption in this 305 section does not prohibit a local government or political 306 subdivision from enacting an ordinance regarding any of the 307 following: 308 (a)âLocal business taxes adopted pursuant to chapter 205. 309 Section 16.âSubsection (1) of section 489.127, Florida 310 Statutes, is amended to read: 311 489.127âProhibitions; penalties.â 312 (1)âNo person shall: 313 (a)âFalsely hold himself or herself or a business 314 organization out as a licensee, certificateholder, or 315 registrant; 316 (b)âFalsely impersonate a certificateholder or registrant; 317 (c)âPresent as his or her own the certificate or 318 registration of another; 319 (d)âKnowingly give false or forged evidence to the board or 320 a member thereof; 321 (e)âUse or attempt to use a certificate or registration 322 that has been suspended or revoked; 323 (f)âEngage in the business or act in the capacity of a 324 contractor or advertise himself or herself or a business 325 organization as available to engage in the business or act in 326 the capacity of a contractor without being duly registered or 327 certified; 328 (g)âOperate a business organization engaged in contracting 329 after 60 days following the termination of its only qualifying 330 agent without designating another primary qualifying agent, 331 except as provided in ss. 489.119 and 489.1195; 332 (h)âCommence or perform work for which a building permit is 333 required pursuant to part IV of chapter 553 without such 334 building permit being in effect; or 335 (i)âWillfully or deliberately disregard or violate any 336 municipal or county ordinance relating to uncertified or 337 unregistered contractors. 338 339 For purposes of this subsection, a person or business 340 organization operating on an inactive or suspended certificate 341 or registration is not duly certified or registered and is 342 considered unlicensed. A business tax receipt issued under the 343 authority of chapter 205 is not a license for purposes of this 344 part. 345 Section 17.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 346 489.128, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 347 489.128âContracts entered into by unlicensed contractors 348 unenforceable.â 349 (1)âAs a matter of public policy, contracts entered into on 350 or after October 1, 1990, by an unlicensed contractor shall be 351 unenforceable in law or in equity by the unlicensed contractor. 352 (b)âFor purposes of this section, an individual or business 353 organization may not be considered unlicensed for failing to 354 have a business tax receipt issued under the authority of 355 chapter 205. 356 Section 18.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 357 489.131, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 358 489.131âApplicability.â 359 (3)âNothing in this part limits the power of a municipality 360 or county: 361 (c)âTo collect business taxes, subject to s. 205.065, and 362 inspection fees for engaging in contracting or examination fees 363 from persons who are registered with the board pursuant to local 364 examination requirements and issue business tax receipts. 365 However, nothing in this part shall be construed to require 366 general contractors, building contractors, or residential 367 contractors to obtain additional business tax receipts for 368 specialty work when such specialty work is performed by 369 employees of such contractors on projects for which they have 370 substantially full responsibility and such contractors do not 371 hold themselves out to the public as being specialty 372 contractors. 373 Section 19.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 374 489.532, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 375 489.532âContracts entered into by unlicensed contractors 376 unenforceable.â 377 (1)âAs a matter of public policy, contracts entered into on 378 or after October 1, 1990, by an unlicensed contractor shall be 379 unenforceable in law or in equity by the unlicensed contractor. 380 (b)âFor purposes of this section, an individual or business 381 organization shall not be considered unlicensed for failing to 382 have a business tax receipt issued under the authority of 383 chapter 205. 384 Section 20.âSubsection (8) of section 489.537, Florida 385 Statutes, is amended to read: 386 489.537âApplication of this part.â 387 (8)âPersons licensed under this part are subject to ss. 388 205.0535(1) and 205.065, as applicable. 389 Section 21.âSubsection (8) of section 500.12, Florida 390 Statutes, is amended to read: 391 500.12âFood permits; building permits.â 392 (8)âA person who applies for or renews a local business tax 393 certificate to engage in business as a food establishment must 394 exhibit a current food permit or an active letter of exemption 395 from the department before the local business tax certificate 396 may be issued or renewed. 397 Section 22.âSubsection (3) of section 500.511, Florida 398 Statutes, is amended to read: 399 500.511âFees; enforcement; preemption.â 400 (3)âPREEMPTION OF AUTHORITY TO REGULATE.âRegulation of 401 bottled water plants, water vending machines, water vending 402 machine operators, and packaged ice plants is preempted by the 403 state. No county or municipality may adopt or enforce any 404 ordinance that regulates the licensure or operation of bottled 405 water plants, water vending machines, or packaged ice plants, 406 unless it is determined that unique conditions exist within the 407 county which require the county to regulate such entities in 408 order to protect the public health. This subsection does not 409 prohibit a county or municipality from requiring a business tax 410 pursuant to chapter 205. 411 Section 23.âSubsection (7) of section 501.015, Florida 412 Statutes, is amended to read: 413 501.015âHealth studios; registration requirements and 414 fees.âEach health studio shall: 415 (7)âA person applying for or renewing a local business tax 416 receipt to engage in business as a health studio must exhibit an 417 active registration certificate from the Department of 418 Agriculture and Consumer Services before the local business tax 419 receipt may be issued or reissued. 420 Section 24.âSubsection (1) of section 501.016, Florida 421 Statutes, is amended to read: 422 501.016âHealth studios; security requirements.âEach health 423 studio that sells contracts for health studio services shall 424 meet the following requirements: 425 (1)âEach health studio shall maintain for each separate 426 business location a bond issued by a surety company admitted to 427 do business in this state. The principal sum of the bond must be 428 $25,000, and the bond, when required, must be obtained before a 429 business tax receipt may be issued under chapter 205. Upon 430 issuance of a business tax receipt, the licensing authority 431 shall immediately notify the department of such issuance in a 432 manner established by the department by rule. The bond must be 433 in favor of the department for the benefit of a person injured 434 as a result of a violation of ss. 501.012-501.019. Liability for 435 injuries as a result of a violation of ss. 501.012-501.019 may 436 be determined in an administrative proceeding of the department 437 or through a civil action. However, claims against the bond or 438 certificate of deposit may only be paid by order of the 439 department in an administrative proceeding in amounts up to the 440 determined liability for the injuries. The aggregate liability 441 of the surety to all persons for all breaches of the conditions 442 of the bonds provided by this section may not exceed the amount 443 of the bond. The original surety bond required by this section 444 shall be filed with the department on a form adopted by 445 department rule. 446 Section 25.âSubsection (8) of section 501.160, Florida 447 Statutes, is amended to read: 448 501.160âRental or sale of essential commodities during a 449 declared state of emergency; prohibition against unconscionable 450 prices.â 451 (8)âUpon a declaration of a state of emergency by the 452 Governor, in order to protect the health, safety, and welfare of 453 residents, any person who offers goods and services for sale to 454 the public during the duration of the emergency and who does not 455 possess a business tax receipt under s. 205.032 or s. 205.042 456 commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as 457 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. During a declared 458 emergency, this subsection does not apply to religious, 459 charitable, fraternal, civic, educational, or social 460 organizations. During a declared emergency and when there is an 461 allegation of price gouging against the person, failure to 462 possess a license constitutes reasonable cause to detain the 463 person, provided that the detention shall only be made in a 464 reasonable manner and only for a reasonable period of time 465 sufficient for an inquiry into the circumstances surrounding the 466 failure to possess a license. 467 Section 26.âParagraphs (a) and (c) of subsection (1) of 468 section 507.13, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 469 507.13âLocal regulation.â 470 (1)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b) paragraphs (b) 471 and (c), this chapter preempts a local ordinance or regulation 472 of a county or municipality which regulates transactions 473 relating to movers of household goods or moving brokers. 474 (c)âThis section does not preempt a local governmentâs 475 authority to levy a local business tax pursuant to chapter 205. 476 Section 27.âParagraph (f) of subsection (3) of section 477 539.001, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 478 539.001âThe Florida Pawnbroking Act.â 479 (3)âLICENSE REQUIRED.â 480 (f)âAny person applying for or renewing a local 481 occupational license to engage in business as a pawnbroker must 482 exhibit a current license from the agency before the local 483 business tax receipt may be issued or reissued. 484 Section 28.âSubsection (7) of section 559.904, Florida 485 Statutes, is amended to read: 486 559.904âMotor vehicle repair shop registration; 487 application; exemption.â 488 (7)âAny person applying for or renewing a local business 489 tax receipt to engage in business as a motor vehicle repair shop 490 must exhibit an active registration certificate from the 491 department before the local business tax receipt may be issued 492 or renewed. 493 Section 29.âSubsection (4) of section 559.928, Florida 494 Statutes, is amended to read: 495 559.928âRegistration.â 496 (4)âA person applying for or renewing a local business tax 497 receipt to engage in business as a seller of travel must exhibit 498 a current registration certificate from the department before 499 the local business tax receipt may be issued or reissued. 500 Section 30.âSubsection (2) of section 559.9281, Florida 501 Statutes, is amended to read: 502 559.9281âStudent tour operators.â 503 (2)âThe department shall adopt rules to implement this 504 section, including the establishment of the application 505 procedures and minimum standards for those persons wishing to be 506 approved as student tour operators under this section. At a 507 minimum, a student tour operator must be registered and approved 508 by the department as a seller of travel under s. 559.928, 509 maintain security requirements provided under s. 559.929, and be 510 current on all state and local business taxes. 511 Section 31.âSubsection (6) of section 559.935, Florida 512 Statutes, is amended to read: 513 559.935âExemptions.â 514 (6)âThe department shall request from the Airlines 515 Reporting Corporation any information necessary to implement the 516 provisions of subsection (2). Persons claiming an exemption 517 under subsection (2) or subsection (3) must show a letter of 518 exemption from the department before a local business tax 519 receipt to engage in business as a seller of travel may be 520 issued or reissued. If the department fails to issue a letter of 521 exemption on a timely basis, the seller of travel shall submit 522 to the department, through certified mail, an affidavit 523 containing her or his name and address and an explanation of the 524 exemption sought. Such affidavit may be used in lieu of a letter 525 of exemption for the purpose of obtaining a business tax 526 receipt. In any civil or criminal proceeding, the burden of 527 proving an exemption under this section is on the person 528 claiming such exemption. A letter of exemption issued by the 529 department may not be used in, and has no bearing on, such 530 proceedings. 531 Section 32.âSection 559.939, Florida Statutes, is amended 532 to read: 533 559.939âState preemption.âNo municipality or county or 534 other political subdivision of this state shall have authority 535 to levy or collect any registration fee or tax, as a regulatory 536 measure, or to require the registration or bonding in any manner 537 of any seller of travel who is registered or complies with all 538 applicable provisions of this part, unless that authority is 539 provided for by special or general act of the Legislature. Any 540 ordinance, resolution, or regulation of any municipality or 541 county or other political subdivision of this state which is in 542 conflict with any provision of this part is preempted by this 543 part. The provisions of this section do not apply to any local 544 business tax levied pursuant to chapter 205. 545 Section 33.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 546 559.955, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 547 559.955âHome-based businesses; local government 548 restrictions.â 549 (2)âA home-based business that operates from a residential 550 property as provided in subsection (3): 551 (c)âIs only subject to applicable business taxes under 552 chapter 205 in the county and municipality in which the home 553 based business is located. 554 Section 34.âSection 616.12, Florida Statutes, is amended to 555 read: 556 616.12âLicenses upon certain shows; distribution of fees; 557 exemptions.â 558 (1)âEach person who operates any traveling show, 559 exhibition, amusement enterprise, carnival, vaudeville, exhibit, 560 rodeo, theatrical, game or test of skill, riding device, 561 dramatic repertoire, other show or amusement, or concession, 562 including a concession operating in a tent, enclosure, or other 563 temporary structure, within the grounds of, and in connection 564 with, any annual public fair held by a fair association shall 565 pay the license taxes provided by law. However, if the 566 association satisfies the requirements of this chapter, 567 including securing the required fair permit from the department, 568 the license taxes and local business tax authorized in chapter 569 205 are waived and the department shall issue a tax exemption 570 certificate. The department shall adopt the proper forms and 571 rules to administer this section, including the necessary tax 572 exemption certificate, showing that the fair association has met 573 all requirements and that the traveling show, exhibition, 574 amusement enterprise, carnival, vaudeville, exhibit, rodeo, 575 theatrical, game or test of skill, riding device, dramatic 576 repertoire, other show or amusement, or concession is exempt. 577 (2)âAny fair association securing the required annual fair 578 permit from the department is exempt from local business tax as 579 defined by chapter 205, occupational permit fees, or any 580 occupational taxes assessed by any county, municipality, 581 political subdivision, agency, or instrumentality thereof. 582 Section 35.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.